Utah statutes.
53B-2a-111.   Board of Trustees -- Consultation with State Board of Regents.

The Utah College of Applied Technology Board of Trustees shall consult with the State Board of Regents to coordinate the delivery of career and technical education.



Amended by Chapter 346, 2009 General Session

